Tennessee, session 114, HB0125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-409(i)(4)(A), is amended by
deleting the first sentence and substituting:
Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision (i)(4)(A), a county or municipal
government that receives a grant under this section must match the grant with an equal
amount of money for each project. For a project located within a county designated as
distressed or at-risk by the Appalachian Regional Commission at the time of the grant
application, a county or municipal government that receives a grant under this section
must match the grant with an amount of money equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the
project.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect October 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0125
000178
- 1 -